Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.50.861

Faculty tenure—Dismissal only for sufficient cause.

The tenured faculty member shall not be dismissed except for sufficient cause, nor shall a faculty member who holds a probationary faculty appointment be dismissed prior to the written terms of the appointment except for sufficient cause.

[ 1969 ex.s. c 283 s 39. Formerly RCW 28.85.861.]

NOTES:

Severability—1969 ex.s. c 283: See note following RCW 28A.150.050.